Missouri, session 2026, HB2291.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.486, to read as follows:
67.486. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Political subdivision", a local public body created under the Constitution of
Missouri or by the general assembly that exercises governmental functions for purposes
of a request made under this section;
(2) "Request", an application for a permit or any other kind of prior approval
from a political subdivision for a permit related to the construction of a new residential,
commercial, or industrial building or the repair or renovation of any such existing
building.
2. (1) If an applicant submits a request to a political subdivision, the political
subdivision shall approve or deny the applicant's request within thirty calendar days.
(2) If no response is received by an applicant within thirty calendar days, the
request shall be deemed approved and the applicant is authorized to proceed with the
construction as provided in the request.
(3) If the request is approved, the political subdivision shall not impose on the
applicant additional requirements related to the request.
(4) (a) If the political subdivision denies the request, the political subdivision
shall state in writing to the applicant the reasons for the denial.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2291 2
(b) The written denial shall consist of the following:
a. If the request relates to work that is stamped by a certified design professional
and such request is denied on the basis of the political subdivision's rejection of such
work, a detailed description of why the work of the design professional who stamped
such work is so inferior or so insufficient that the political subdivision cannot approve
the request; or
b. If the request is denied on the basis of a violation of a code provision
governing any part of the development or improvement that is the subject of the
request, a citation to the code provision the political subdivision determines has been
violated.
(5) The time limit in this subsection begins upon the political subdivision's
receipt of the applicant's request as indicated by the political subdivision's notification
to the applicant that the applicant's electronic submission was received or a receipt
provided to the applicant upon the in-person submission of such request.
3. (1) A political subdivision may deny an applicant's request under subsection 2
of this section as incomplete.
(2) The request is incomplete if the political subdivision determines the request
fails to contain all information required by law, or by rule, ordinance, or policy of the
political subdivision, adopted prior to the submission of the request.
(3) If the political subdivision denies a request as incomplete, the political
subdivision shall state in writing to the applicant the reasons for the denial of the
request as incomplete and provide the applicant ten calendar days during which such
applicant may resubmit the application with the requested information for a review in
the application's entirety for approval or denial as provided under subsection 2 of this
section.
(4) If an applicant resubmits a subsequent incomplete request after receiving a
written denial as incomplete, the political subdivision shall not issue a subsequent denial
of the request as incomplete for reasons not included in the denial for incompleteness of
the initial request.
(5) Nothing in this subsection prevents a political subdivision from denying any
resubmitted incomplete request for a reason related to the merits of the request rather
than the completeness of the request as provided under subsection 2 of this section.
4. If an applicant resubmits a request after receiving a written denial as required
under subsection 2 of this section, the political subdivision shall not issue a subsequent
denial that includes additional unrelated reasons for denial that were unspecified and
not included in the denial of the initial request.

HB 2291 3
5. (1) The time limit in subsection 2 of this section shall reset only if, within
twenty calendar days of receipt of the applicant's initial request, the political subdivision
sends written notice to the applicant of the denial of the request as incomplete as
provided under subsection 3 of this section.
(2) If the denial of the request as incomplete by the political subdivision is after
twenty calendar days and before the time limit in subsection 2 of this section and the
applicant resubmits the application with the requested information for a review in the
application's entirety, the political subdivision shall have ten calendar days to approve
or deny the application based on the merits.
✔